Massachusetts, session 194th, H3991.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 188 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, an owner of a home
who is at least 65 years old or an owner of a home who has a documented disability shall receive
an additional homestead exemption equal to 25 per cent of the baseline exemption for their
county. For purposes of this subsection, “documented disability” shall mean a medically-
determinable, permanent physical or mental impairment that meets the disability requirements
for Supplemental Security Income under 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3)(A) and 42 U.S.C.
1382c(a)(3)(C) that is documented and in effect at the time of recording.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 188 is hereby further amended by adding following section:-
Section 15. (a) For purposes of this section, the word “department” shall mean the
department of revenue.
of 3

(b) The homestead exemption shall provide financial protection to homeowners by
safeguarding a portion of the equity in their principal residence from creditors’ claims, subject to
the following:
(1) The homestead exemption shall be calculated annually by the department based on a
percentage of the median home value for each county, as determined by statewide property tax
assessments. The exemption shall not be less than $250,000 nor exceed $1,250,000, ensuring
equitable protection across all counties in the commonwealth.
(2) For properties owned by joint tenants, tenants by the entirety or trust beneficiaries, the
homestead exemption amount shall be applied in full to the property, with no proration among
co-owners. If multiple declarations are filed for the same property, the maximum cumulative
exemption shall not exceed the market-adjusted limit pursuant to subsection (b) for the county.
(3) The department shall annually adjust the minimum and maximum homestead
exemption thresholds based on the consumer price index to account for changes in the cost of
living in the commonwealth.
(4) First-time homebuyers earning less than 120 per cent of the area median income may
qualify for a temporary 10 per cent increase in the homestead exemption during their first 5 years
of ownership.
(c) The secretary of the commonwealth shall develop and implement a statewide
education campaign to ensure homeowners are aware of their rights under this chapter,
including: (i) publishing multilingual materials on the homestead declaration process; (ii) hosting
informational sessions in partnership with municipalities and housing advocacy groups; and
of 3

(iii) streamlining the declaration filing process, including online submission options.
(d) The department shall prepare an annual report that shall include: (i) the number of
homestead declarations filed by county; (ii) the impact of market-adjusted exemptions on
homeowner protections; and (iii) any recommendations for further improvements to the
homestead exemption based on economic and demographic trends. The report shall be submitted,
no later than December 31 of each year, to the chairs of the joint committee on housing, the
chairs of the joint committee on revenue and the clerks of the house of representatives and
senate.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 3